Maryland, session 2026, HB1285.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–426.5.
(a) Each county board shall establish a policy in accordance with school health
guidelines and State laws and regulations for public schools within its jurisdiction to
authorize the school nurse, school health services personnel, and other school personnel to
administer naloxone or other overdose–reversing medication to a student or other person
located on school property who is reasonably believed to be experiencing an opioid overdose.
(b) The policy established under subsection (a) of this section shall include:
(1) A provision requiring all public schools to obtain and store at the public
school naloxone or other overdose–reversing medication to be used in an emergency
situation; [and]
(2) A PROVISION ALLOWING THE POSSESSION, STORAGE, AND
ADMINISTRATION OF EXPIRED NALOXONE FOR 1 YEAR AFTER THE EXPIRATION
DATE; AND
[(2)] (3) A requirement that each public school develop and implement a
method for notifying the parents or guardians of students of the school’s policy under this
section at the beginning of each school year.
11–1202.
(a) Each institution of higher education shall establish a policy that addresses
heroin and opioid addiction and prevention.

HOUSE BILL 1285 3
(b) The policy established under this subtitle shall [require]:
(1) REQUIRE each institution to:
[(1)] (I) Require incoming full–time students to participate in an
in–person heroin and opioid addiction and prevention awareness training, unless in–person
training is impracticable, then to participate in an electronic heroin and opioid addiction
and prevention awareness training;
[(2)] (II) Provide incoming part–time students with resources that alert
and educate the students regarding heroin and opioid addiction and prevention; and
[(3)] (III) Obtain and store at the institution naloxone or other
overdose–reversing medication to be used in an emergency situation; AND
(2) ALLOW EACH INSTITUTION TO POSSESS, STORE, AND ADMINISTER
EXPIRED NALOXONE FOR 1 YEAR AFTER THE EXPIRATION DATE.
13–518.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Automated external defibrillator (AED)” has the meaning stated in §
13–517 of this subtitle.
(3) (I) “Naloxone” means the medication approved by the federal Food
and Drug Administration for community use for the reversal of a known or suspected opioid
overdose.
(II) “NALOXONE” INCLUDES MEDICATION DESCRIBED UNDER
SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH THAT HAS BEEN EXPIRED FOR LESS THAN
1 YEAR.
(4) “Public building” means:
(i) A public mass transportation accommodation, such as a terminal
or station, that is supported by public funds;
(ii) An improvement of a public area used for gathering or
amusement, including a public park or recreation center; or
(iii) A facility that is supported by public funds and primarily used to
provide secondary or higher education.
(b) (1) The EMS Board, in collaboration with the Maryland Department of
Health, shall develop and implement an initiative under the Public Access Automated

HOUSE BILL 1285
External Defibrillator Program to require that naloxone be co–located with each automated
external defibrillator placed in a public building.
(2) The initiative developed under paragraph (1) of this subsection shall
ensure that up to two doses of naloxone are maintained in a location that:
(i) Is visible and in close physical proximity to the automated
external defibrillator; and
(ii) Has a label that clearly indicates to the public the availability of
naloxone.
(3) The initiative developed under paragraph (1) of this subsection shall be
funded using funds from the Opioid Restitution Fund appropriated through the State
budget.
(c) (1) The owner or operator of a public building is not civilly liable for any
act or omission in the provision and maintenance of naloxone under the initiative developed
under subsection (b)(1) of this section if the owner or operator has satisfied any
requirements established for providing and maintaining naloxone under the initiative.
(2) An individual who administers naloxone made available under the
initiative developed under paragraph (1) of this subsection in response to a known or
suspected drug overdose shall have immunity from civil liability as provided in § 5–603 of
the Courts Article.
Article – Health – General
8–408.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Community services program” includes a homeless services program.
(3) “Homeless services program” means a program operated by the
Department of Housing and Community Development through a local administering
agency or service provider for the purpose of providing shelter, food, and services to
homeless family units in the State.
(4) “Intensive outpatient program” means a treatment program that
addresses substance use disorders or other disorders that do not require detoxification or
inpatient supervision and are designated by the American Society of Addiction Medicine as
a level 2.1 setting.
(5) “Opioid treatment program” means a program approved by the
Department to provide opioid maintenance therapy under regulations adopted by the
Department.

HOUSE BILL 1285 5
(b) On or before June 30, 2024, a community services program that provides
services to individuals who have a substance use disorder or an opioid use disorder or are
at risk of experiencing a drug overdose shall have a protocol to offer opioid overdose reversal
drugs approved by the federal Food and Drug Administration, INCLUDING AN OPIOID
REVERSAL DRUG THAT HAS BEEN EXPIRED FOR LESS THAN 1 YEAR, free of charge, to
those individuals who have an opioid use disorder or are at risk of experiencing a drug
overdose when the individual receives services from the community services program.
(c) On or before June 30, 2023, each opioid treatment program and each intensive
outpatient treatment program shall have a protocol to offer an opioid overdose reversal
drug approved by the federal Food and Drug Administration, free of charge, when an
individual receives services from the opioid treatment program or intensive outpatient
treatment program.
(d) On or before June 30, 2024:
(1) State and local correctional facilities shall have a protocol to offer an
opioid overdose reversal drug approved by the federal Food and Drug Administration,
INCLUDING NALOXONE THAT HAS BEEN EXPIRED FOR LESS THAN 1 YEAR, free of
charge, to sentenced individuals who have an opioid use disorder or who are at risk of
experiencing a drug overdose before the individual’s release; and
(2) The Division of Parole and Probation shall have a protocol to offer an
opioid overdose reversal drug approved by the federal Food and Drug Administration,
INCLUDING NALOXONE THAT HAS BEEN EXPIRED FOR LESS THAN 1 YEAR, free of
charge, to individuals under supervision who have an opioid use disorder or are at risk of
experiencing a drug overdose.
(e) The Secretary may adopt regulations to carry out this section.
13–3101.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(B) “OPIOID OVERDOSE REVERSAL DRUG” INCLUDES AN OPIOID OVERDOSE
REVERSAL DRUG THAT HAS BEEN EXPIRED FOR LESS THAN 1 YEAR.
[(b)] (C) “Pharmacist” has the meaning stated in § 12–101 of the Health
Occupations Article.
[(c)] (D) “Private or public entity” means a health care provider, local health
department, community–based organization, substance abuse treatment organization, or
other person that addresses medical or social issues related to drug addiction.
[(d)] (E) “Program” means the Overdose Response Program.

HOUSE BILL 1285
[(e)] (F) “Standing order” means a written instruction for the prescribing and
dispensing of an opioid overdose reversal drug approved by the federal Food and Drug
Administration in accordance with § 13–3106 of this subtitle.
13–3102.
The Overdose Response Program is a program administered by the Department for
the purpose of providing a means of authorizing certain individuals to administer an opioid
overdose reversal drug approved by the federal Food and Drug Administration to an
individual experiencing, or believed to be experiencing, opioid overdose to help prevent a
fatality when medical services are not immediately available.
13–3501.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Co–prescribing” means, with respect to an opioid overdose reversal drug, the
practice of prescribing the drug in conjunction with an opioid prescription for a patient at
an elevated risk of overdose.
(c) (1) “Opioid overdose reversal drug” means naloxone or a similarly acting
and equally safe drug that is approved by the federal Food and Drug Administration for
the treatment of a known or suspected opioid overdose.
(2) “OPIOID OVERDOSE REVERSAL DRUG” INCLUDES A DRUG
DESCRIBED IN PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION THAT HAS BEEN EXPIRED FOR
LESS THAN 1 YEAR.
13–3502.
(a) The Secretary shall establish guidelines for the co–prescribing of opioid
overdose reversal drugs that are applicable to all licensed health care providers in the State
who are authorized by law to prescribe a monitored prescription drug, as defined in §
21–2A–01 of this article.
(b) The guidelines established under subsection (a) of this section shall address
the co–prescribing of opioid overdose reversal drugs for patients who are:
(1) At an elevated risk of overdose; and
(2) (i) Receiving opioid therapy for chronic pain;
(ii) Receiving a prescription for benzodiazepines; or
(iii) Being treated for opioid use disorders.

HOUSE BILL 1285 7
21–2A–01.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(g) (1) “Naloxone medication” means an opioid antagonist approved by the
federal Food and Drug Administration for the reversal of an opioid overdose.
(2) “NALOXONE MEDICATION” INCLUDES AN OPIOID ANTAGONIST
DESCRIBED IN PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION THAT HAS BEEN EXPIRED FOR
LESS THAN 1 YEAR.
(h) “Naloxone medication data” means the information submitted to the Program
for naloxone medication.
(q) “Program” means the Prescription Drug Monitoring Program established
under this subtitle.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.